Hawaii, session 2025, SB599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that since January 1, 2022, all cat and dog owners in Hawaii have been required to have a microchip implanted in their pet and to register that microchip number and the owner's contact information with a microchip registration company.  The legislature further finds that when employees of the state and county agencies responsible for disposing roadkill pick up dead cats and dogs that have been killed on public roadways, they do not routinely scan the deceased animals for microchips or take any other measures to ascertain the animal's owner. As a result, owners of lost cats or dogs are not informed if their pet has been killed by a vehicle. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the appropriate state and county agencies to: (1)  Scan deceased cats and dogs collected from public roadways for microchips and, if applicable, record the microchip as well as any other relevant information from the animal's tag or collar; (2)  Notify county animal services or animal service contractors of the deceased dog or cat; and (3)  Appropriate funds for the purchase of microchip scanning equipment. SECTION 2.  Chapter 264, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§264-     Deceased cats and dogs; disposal.  (a) When disposing of a deceased cat or dog found on a public roadway, the department shall check for, scan, and record the microchip of the deceased cat or dog, if any, along with the location found, descriptive information of the cat or dog and, if applicable, any contact information such as a phone number, name, or address shown on the animal's collar or tag. (b) When disposing of a deceased cat or dog found on a public roadway, the department shall timely notify the appropriate county animal services or animal service contractors of the deceased cat or dog, including the microchip number, if any; location found; descriptive information about the cat or dog; and, if applicable, any contact information such as a phone number, name, or address shown on the animal's collar or tag." SECTION 3.  Chapter 265A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§265A-     Deceased cats and dogs; disposal.  (a)  When disposing of a deceased cat or dog found on a public roadway, the appropriate county department shall check for, scan, and record the microchip of the deceased cat or dog, if any, along with the location found, descriptive information of the cat or dog and, if applicable, any contact information such as a phone number, name, or address shown on the animal's collar or tag. (b) When disposing of a deceased cat or dog found on a public roadway, the appropriate county department shall timely notify the appropriate county animal services or animal service contractors of the deceased cat or dog, including the microchip number, if any; location found; descriptive information about the cat or dog; and, if applicable, any contact information such as a phone number, name, or address shown on the animal's collar or tag." SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purchase of microchip scanning equipment; provided that: $ shall go to the county of Hawaii; $ shall go to the county of Kauai; $ shall go to the county of Maui; and $ shall go to the city and county of Honolulu. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________